src-fst-stems-verb_stems.lexc.md
Tsuut'ina (srs) verb stems



Morphophonological special characters





































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































Continuation lexica specifying Valence + Aspect + TAMA + Voice-Valence with flags


































































































































































































































































































































* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/stems/verb_stems.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-srs/blob/main/../src/fst/stems/verb_stems.lexc)</small>
